District of Columbia statutes.
8-1308

Appeal procedures.

Any person adversely affected by an action taken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated thereto is entitled to a hearing before the Mayor upon filing with the Mayor, within 15 days of the date of such action, a written request for a hearing. Such hearing shall be held in accordance with other contested case procedures under the provisions of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-509). The decision on the appeal shall be final.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 9, 24 DCR 6289
1981 Ed., § 6-708.
1973 Ed., § 6-528.